Washington statutes.
RCW 15.66.263

Costs of implementing RCW 15.66.141.

The costs incurred by the department of agriculture that are associated with the implementation of RCW 15.66.141 shall be paid for by the affected commodity commissions.

[ 2003 c 396 s 8.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2003 c 396: See note following RCW 15.66.030.